Nevada, session 83, AB88.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. NRS 62C.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62C.230 1. If the district attorney files a petition with the
juvenile court, the juvenile court may:
(a) [Dismiss] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
dismiss the petition without prejudice and refer the child to the
probation officer for informal supervision [pursuant to NRS
62C.200;] if the child voluntarily admits participation in the acts
alleged in the petition and if:
(1) All parties agree to informal supervision; or
(2) The juvenile court finds, after a hearing on the matter,
that informal supervision is appropriate; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) Place the child under the supervision of the juvenile court
pursuant to a supervision and consent decree, without a formal
adjudication of delinquency, if the juvenile court receives:
(1) The recommendation of the probation officer;
(2) The written approval of the district attorney; and
(3) The written consent and approval of the child and the
parent or guardian of the child.
2. If a child is placed under the supervision of the juvenile
court pursuant to a supervision and consent decree, the juvenile
court may dismiss the petition if the child successfully completes
the terms and conditions of the supervision and consent decree.
3. If the petition is dismissed pursuant to subsection 2:
(a) The child may respond to any inquiry concerning the
proceedings and events which brought about the proceedings as if
they had not occurred; and
(b) The records concerning a supervision and consent decree
may be considered in a subsequent proceeding before the juvenile
court regarding that child.
4. The juvenile court may not refer a child to a probation
officer for informal supervision pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 if the petition filed against the child contains
allegations that the child committed an unlawful act which, if
committed by an adult, would have constituted:
(a) A category A felony; or
(b) Any other felony involving the use or threatened use of
force or violence.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)